Maine, session 132, LD454.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§1, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
1. Certified candidate. "Certified candidate" means a candidate running for
Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, Secretary of State or Attorney General
who chooses to participate in the Maine Clean Election Act and who is certified as a Maine
Clean Election Act candidate under section 1125, subsection 5.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§5, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
5. Nonparticipating candidate. "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate
running for Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, Secretary of State or Attorney
General who does not choose to participate in the Maine Clean Election Act and who is not
seeking to be certified as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate under section 1125,
subsection 5.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§6, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
6. Participating candidate. "Participating candidate" means a candidate who is
running for Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, Secretary of State or Attorney
General who is seeking to be certified as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate under
section 1125, subsection 5.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§8, ¶B, as amended by PL 2009, c. 286, §5, is
further amended to read:
B. For State Senate or, State House of Representatives, Secretary of State or Attorney
General participating candidates, the qualifying period begins January 1st of the
election year and ends at 5:00 p.m. on April 20th of that election year or the next
business day following April 20th if the office of the commission is closed on April
20th.
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §1123, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended to read:
§1123. Alternative campaign financing option
This chapter establishes an alternative campaign financing option available to
candidates running for Governor, State Senator and, State Representative, Secretary of
State and Attorney General. This alternative campaign financing option is available to
candidates running for Governor, State Senator and State Representative for elections to be
held beginning in the year 2000. This alternative campaign financing option is available
to candidates running for Secretary of State and Attorney General for elections to be held
beginning in the year 2028. The commission shall administer this Act and the fund.
Candidates participating in the Maine Clean Election Act must shall also comply with all
other applicable election and campaign laws and regulations.
Sec. 6. 21-A MRSA §1124, sub-§1, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0785(01)

1. Established. The Maine Clean Election Fund is established to finance the election
campaigns of certified Maine Clean Election Act candidates running for Governor, State
Senator and, State Representative, Secretary of State and Attorney General and to pay
administrative and enforcement costs of the commission related to this Act. The fund is a
special, dedicated, nonlapsing fund and any interest generated by the fund is credited to the
fund. The commission shall administer the fund.
Sec. 7. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§2-C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 132, §10, is
amended to read:
2-C. Change in campaign financing. If a candidate has accepted contributions as a
candidate for Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, Secretary of State or
Attorney General that are not seed money contributions as defined in section 1122,
subsection 9 or do not comply with the seed money restrictions in subsections 2 and 2‑A,
the candidate is ineligible for certification in the same election cycle.
Sec. 8. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§5, as amended by IB 2015, c. 1, §20, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The executive director shall certify a candidate complying with the requirements of this
section as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate as soon as possible after final submittal of
qualifying contributions and other supporting documents required under subsection 4 but
no later than 3 business days for legislative, Secretary of State and Attorney General
candidates and 5 business days for gubernatorial candidates. The executive director may
take additional time if further investigation is necessary to verify compliance with this Act
as long as the commission notifies the candidate regarding the anticipated schedule for
conclusion of the investigation. A candidate or other interested person may appeal the
decision of the executive director to the members of the commission in accordance with
subsection 14.
Sec. 9. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§7-B, ¶B, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 1, §23, is
amended to read:
B. For legislative, Secretary of State and Attorney General candidates, any
supplemental general election distributions made pursuant to subsections 8‑C and 8‑D
must be made within 3 business days of certification by the commission of the required
number of additional qualifying contributions.
Sec. 10. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§8-E, ¶B, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 1, §25, is
amended to read:
B. For legislative, Secretary of State and Attorney General candidates, no earlier than
January 1st of the election year and no later than 3 weeks before election day.
Sec. 11. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§8-F, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 1, §25, is
amended to read:
8-F. Amount of distributions. On December 1st of each even-numbered year the
commission shall review and adjust the distribution amounts in subsections 8‑B to 8‑D and
the distribution amounts for Secretary of State and Attorney General candidates established
by the commission based on the Consumer Price Index as reported by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. If an adjustment is warranted by the
Consumer Price Index, the distribution amounts must be adjusted, rounded to the nearest
Page 2 - 132LR0785(01)

414 amount divisible by $25. When making adjustments under this subsection, the commission
425 may not change the number of qualifying contributions or additional qualifying
436 contributions required to trigger an initial distribution or an increment of supplemental
447 distribution. The commission shall post information about the distribution amounts
458 including the date of any adjustment on its publicly accessible website and include this
469 information with any publication to be used as a guide for candidates.
Sec. 12. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§10, as amended by IB 2015, c. 1, §26, is further
amended to read:
10. Candidate not enrolled in a party. An unenrolled candidate for the Legislature,
Secretary of State or Attorney General who submits the required number of qualifying
contributions and other required documents under subsection 4 by 5:00 p.m. on April 20th
preceding the primary election and who is certified is eligible for revenues from the fund
in the same amounts and at the same time as an uncontested primary election candidate and
a general election candidate as specified in subsections 7, 8‑C and 8‑D. Revenues for the
general election must be distributed to the candidate as specified in subsection 7. An
unenrolled candidate for Governor who submits the required number of qualifying
contributions and other required documents under subsection 4 by 5:00 p.m. on April 1st
preceding the primary election and who is certified is eligible for revenues from the fund
in the same amounts and at the same time as an uncontested primary election gubernatorial
candidate and a general election gubernatorial candidate as specified in subsections 7 and
8‑B. Revenues for the general election must be distributed to the candidate for Governor
as specified in subsection 7.
Sec. 13. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§15 is enacted to read:
15. Terms of participation for Secretary of State and Attorney General
candidates. The commission shall establish terms of participation for Secretary of State
and Attorney General candidates that allow candidates to qualify and participate starting
with the 2028 election cycle. The terms of participation established by the commission
must set forth the seed money contribution limits, the number of qualifying contributions
and the amount of revenue to be distributed from the fund and the timing of such
distributions. When establishing the terms of participation, the commission shall consider
the terms of participation for gubernatorial and legislative candidates set forth in this
chapter, including an assessment of the difficulty of certification under this section and
distribution amounts available to participating Senate and House candidates and
gubernatorial candidates relative to the population of Senate and House districts and the
State. The commission may establish different terms of participation for Secretary of State
candidates and Attorney General candidates.
Sec. 14. 21-A MRSA §1126, as amended by PL 2023, c. 211, §5, is further amended
to read:
§1126. Commission to adopt rules
The commission shall adopt rules to ensure effective administration of this chapter.
These rules must include but may not be limited to procedures for obtaining qualifying
contributions, certification as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate, circumstances
involving special elections, recounts, collection of revenues for the fund, distribution of
fund revenue to certified candidates, return of unspent fund disbursements, disposition of
equipment purchased with clean election funds, terms of participation for Secretary of State
Page 3 - 132LR0785(01)

416 and Attorney General candidates and compliance with the Maine Clean Election Act. Rules
427 of the commission required by this section are major substantive rules as defined in Title
438 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 15. Contingent effective date. This Act takes effect only if a resolution
proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Maine takes effect to provide for the
popular election of and to apply ranked-choice voting to elections for the offices of
Secretary of State and Attorney General.